waterfox/browser/locales/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX wO Y 43
SFX wO aindre aindre/n'q'd'l'm't's' aindre po:infi
SFX wO aindre aignant/n'q'd'l'm't's' aindre po:ppre
SFX wO aindre aint/L'D'Q' aindre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX wO aindre aints/D'Q' aindre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX wO aindre ainte/L'D'Q' aindre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX wO aindre aintes/D'Q' aindre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX wO aindre ains/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aint/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignons/n'q'l't' aindre po:ipre po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignez/n'q'l'm' aindre po:ipre po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignent/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX wO aindre aignais/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignait/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:iimp po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignions/n'q'l't' aindre po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aigniez/n'q'l'm' aindre po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignaient/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:iimp po:3pl
SFX wO aindre aignis/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignit/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignîmes/n'q'l't' aindre po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignîtes/n'q'l'm' aindre po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignirent/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX wO aindre aindrai/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre po:ifut po:1sg
SFX wO aindre aindras/n'q'l'm't' aindre po:ifut po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aindra/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:ifut po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aindrons/n'q'l't' aindre po:ifut po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aindrez/n'q'l'm' aindre po:ifut po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aindront/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX wO aindre aindrais/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aindrait/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:cond po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aindrions/n'q'l't' aindre po:cond po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aindriez/n'q'l'm' aindre po:cond po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aindraient/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:cond po:3pl
SFX wO aindre aigne/j'n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignes/n'q'l'm't' aindre po:spre po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignisse/j'n'q'l'm't' aindre po:simp po:1sg
SFX wO aindre aignisses/n'q'l'm't' aindre po:simp po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignît/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:simp po:3sg
SFX wO aindre aignissions/n'q'l't' aindre po:simp po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignissiez/n'q'l'm' aindre po:simp po:2pl
SFX wO aindre aignissent/n'q'l'm't's' aindre po:simp po:3pl
SFX wO aindre ains/n'l'm't' aindre po:impe po:2sg
SFX wO aindre aignons/n'l't' aindre po:impe po:1pl
SFX wO aindre aignez/n'l'm' aindre po:impe po:2pl

SFX wP Y 43
SFX wP aincre aincre/n'q'd'l'm't's' vaincre po:infi
SFX wP aincre ainquant/n'q'd'l'm't's' vaincre po:ppre
SFX wP aincre aincu/L'D'Q' vaincre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX wP aincre aincus/D'Q' vaincre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX wP aincre aincue/L'D'Q' vaincre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX wP aincre aincues/D'Q' vaincre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX wP aincre aincs/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainc/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquons/n'q'l't' vaincre po:ipre po:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquez/n'q'l'm' vaincre po:ipre po:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquent/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX wP aincre ainquais/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquait/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:iimp po:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquions/n'q'l't' vaincre po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquiez/n'q'l'm' vaincre po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquaient/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:iimp po:3pl
SFX wP aincre ainquis/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquit/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquîmes/n'q'l't' vaincre po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquîtes/n'q'l'm' vaincre po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquirent/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX wP aincre aincrai/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre po:ifut po:1sg
SFX wP aincre aincras/n'q'l'm't' vaincre po:ifut po:2sg
SFX wP aincre aincra/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:ifut po:3sg
SFX wP aincre aincrons/n'q'l't' vaincre po:ifut po:1pl
SFX wP aincre aincrez/n'q'l'm' vaincre po:ifut po:2pl
SFX wP aincre aincront/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX wP aincre aincrais/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wP aincre aincrait/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:cond po:3sg
SFX wP aincre aincrions/n'q'l't' vaincre po:cond po:1pl
SFX wP aincre aincriez/n'q'l'm' vaincre po:cond po:2pl
SFX wP aincre aincraient/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:cond po:3pl
SFX wP aincre ainque/j'n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainques/n'q'l'm't' vaincre po:spre po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquisse/j'n'q'l'm't' vaincre po:simp po:1sg
SFX wP aincre ainquisses/n'q'l'm't' vaincre po:simp po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquît/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:simp po:3sg
SFX wP aincre ainquissions/n'q'l't' vaincre po:simp po:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquissiez/n'q'l'm' vaincre po:simp po:2pl
SFX wP aincre ainquissent/n'q'l'm't's' vaincre po:simp po:3pl
SFX wP aincre aincs/n'l'm't' vaincre po:impe po:2sg
SFX wP aincre ainquons/n'l't' vaincre po:impe po:1pl
SFX wP aincre ainquez/n'l'm' vaincre po:impe po:2pl
